Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2183YH (3) 91 jm/md H.F. 916 Section 1. Section 425.17, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. âClaimantâ means any of the following: 3 (1) A person filing a claim for credit under this subchapter 4 who has attained the age of sixty-five years but who has 5 not attained the age of seventy years on or before December 6 31 of the base year, a person filing a claim for credit or 7 reimbursement under this subchapter who is totally disabled 8 and was totally disabled on or before December 31 of the base 9 year, or a person filing a claim for reimbursement under this 10 subchapter who has attained the age of sixty-five years on or 11 before December 31 of the base year and who is domiciled in 12 this state at the time the claim is filed or at the time of the 13 personâs death in the case of a claim filed by the executor or 14 administrator of the claimantâs estate. 15 (2) A person filing a claim for credit or reimbursement 16 under this subchapter who has attained the age of twenty-three 17 years on or before December 31 of the base year or was a head 18 of household on December 31 of the base year, as defined in 19 the Internal Revenue Code, but has not attained the age or 20 disability status described in subparagraph (1) or the age 21 status and eligibility criteria of subparagraph (3), and is 22 domiciled in this state at the time the claim is filed or at the 23 time of the personâs death in the case of a claim filed by the 24 executor or administrator of the claimantâs estate, and was not 25 claimed as a dependent on any other personâs tax return for the 26 base year. 27 (3) A person filing a claim for credit under this subchapter 28 who has attained the age of seventy sixty-five years on or 29 before December 31 of the base year , who has a household income 30 of less than two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty 31 level, as defined by the most recently revised poverty income 32 guidelines published by the United States department of health 33 and human services, and is domiciled in this state at the time 34 the claim is filed or at the time of the personâs death in the 35 -1- LSB 2183YH (3) 91 jm/md 1/ 3 H.F. 916 case of a claim filed by the executor or administrator of the 1 claimantâs estate. 2 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to claims under 3 chapter 425, subchapter II, filed on or after January 1, 2026. 4